California, session 20252026, AB1152.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11056 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11056. (a) The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule III.(b) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of those isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted compounds under Section 1308.32 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that list for those drugs or that is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances.(2) Benzphetamine.(3) Chlorphentermine.(4) Clortermine.(5) Mazindol.(6) Phendimetrazine.(c) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted in Section 11059 or elsewhere, or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:(1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following:(A) Amobarbital.(B) Secobarbital.(C) Pentobarbital or any salt thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients that are not listed in any schedule.(2) Any suppository dosage form containing any of the following:(A) Amobarbital.(B) Secobarbital.(C) Pentobarbital or any salt of any of these drugs and approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository.(3) Any substance that contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or any salt thereof.(4) Chlorhexadol.(5) Lysergic acid.(6) Lysergic acid amide.(7) Methyprylon.(8) Sulfondiethylmethane.(9) Sulfonethylmethane.(10) Sulfonmethane.(11) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid, and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, contained in a drug product for which an application has been approved under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 355).(d) Nalorphine.(e) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:(1) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium.(2) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(3) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(4) Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(5) Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(6) Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(f) Anabolic steroids and chorionic gonadotropin, except for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG). Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing chorionic gonadotropin, except hCG, or an anabolic steroid (excluding anabolic steroid products listed in the “Table of Exempt Anabolic Steroid Products” (Section 1308.34 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations), as exempt from the federal Controlled Substances Act (Section 801 and following of Title 21 of the United States Code)), including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Androisoxazole.(2) Androstenediol.(3) Bolandiol.(4) Bolasterone.(5) Boldenone.(6) Chloromethandienone.(7) Clostebol.(8) Dihydromesterone.(9) Ethylestrenol.(10) Fluoxymesterone.(11) Formyldienolone.(12) 4-Hydroxy-19-nortestosterone.(13) Mesterolone.(14) Methandriol.(15) Methandrostenolone.(16) Methenolone.(17) 17-Methyltestosterone.(18) Methyltrienolone.(19) Nandrolone.(20) Norbolethone.(21) Norethandrolone.(22) Normethandrolone.(23) Oxandrolone.(24) Oxymesterone.(25) Oxymetholone.(26) Quinbolone.(27) Stanolone.(28) Stanozolol.(29) Stenbolone.(30) Testosterone.(31) Trenbolone.(g) Ketamine. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing ketamine.(h) Hallucinogenic substances. Any of the following hallucinogenic substances: dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.